Utah statutes.
30-1-37.   Confidentiality of information obtained under counseling provisions.

Except for the information required or to be required on the marriage license application form, any information given by a marriage license applicant in compliance with this chapter shall be confidential information and may not be released by any person, board, commission, or other entity.  However, the premarital counseling board or board of commissioners may use the information, without identification of individuals, to compile and release statistical data.

